Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.060

Requirements for licensure.

In order to become a licensed geologist, an applicant must meet the following requirements:

(1) The applicant shall be of good moral and ethical character as attested to by letters of reference submitted by the applicant or as otherwise determined by the board;

(2) The applicant shall have graduated from a course of study in geology satisfactory to the board or satisfy educational equivalents determined by the board;

(3) The applicant shall have a documented record of a minimum of five years of experience in geology or a specialty of geology, obtained subsequent to completion of the academic requirements specified in this section, in geological work of a character satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of such work upon licensing as a geologist. The board shall require that three years of the experience be gained under the supervision of a geologist licensed in this or any other state, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work;

(4) The applicant shall have passed an examination covering the fundamentals and practice of geology prescribed or accepted by the board;

(5) The applicant shall meet other general or individual requirements established by the board pursuant to its authority under this chapter;

(6) For licensing in any geological specialty recognized under this chapter, an applicant must first be a licensed geologist under this chapter, and then meet the following requirements:

(a) In addition to the educational requirements for licensing as a geologist defined in subsection (2) of this section, an applicant for licensing in any specialty of geology established by the board shall have successfully completed advanced study pertinent to their specialty, or equivalent seminars or on-the-job training acceptable to the board;

(b) The applicant's experience shall include a documented record of five years of experience, after completion of the academic requirements specified in this subsection, in geological work in the applicable specialty of a character satisfactory to the board, and demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of the specialty work upon licensing in that specialty of geology. The board shall require that three years of the experience be gained under the supervision of a geologist licensed in the specialty in this or any other state, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work in the specialty; and

(c) The applicant must pass an examination in the applicable specialty prescribed or accepted by the board;

(7) The following standards are applicable to experience in the practice of geology or a specialty required under subsections (3) and (6) of this section:

(a) Each year of professional practice of a character acceptable to the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a geologist who (i) is licensed in this state or is licensed in another state with licensing standards substantially similar to those under this chapter; or (ii) meets the educational and experience requirements for licensing, but who is not required to be licensed under the limitations of this chapter, qualifies as one year of professional experience in geology;

(b) Each year of professional specialty practice of a character acceptable to the board, carried out under the direct supervision of a (i) geologist who is licensed in a specialty under this chapter, or who is licensed as a specialty geologist in another state that has licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this chapter; or (ii) specialty geologist who meets the educational and experience requirements for licensing, but who is not required to be licensed under the limitations of this chapter, qualifies as one year of practice in the applicable specialty of geology; and

(c) Experience in professional practice, of a character acceptable to the board and acquired prior to one year after July 1, 2001, qualifies if the experience (i) was acquired under the direct supervision of a geologist who meets the educational and experience requirements for licensing under this chapter, or who is licensed in another state that has licensing requirements that are substantially similar to this chapter; or (ii) would constitute responsible charge of professional geological work, as determined by the board;

(8) Each year of full-time graduate study in the geological sciences or in a specialty of geology shall qualify as one year of professional experience in geology or the applicable specialty of geology, up to a maximum of two years. The board may accept geological research, teaching of geology, or a geological specialty at the college or university level as qualifying experience, provided that such research or teaching, in the judgment of the board, is comparable to experience obtained in the practice of geology or a specialty thereof;

(9) An applicant who applies for licensing before July 1, 2003, shall be considered to be qualified for licensing, without further written examination, if the applicant possesses the following qualifications:

(a)(i) A specific record of graduation with a bachelor of science or bachelor of arts or higher degree, with a major in geology granted by an approved institution of higher education acceptable to the board; or

(ii) Graduation from an approved institution of higher education in a four-year academic degree program other than geology, but with the required number of course hours as defined by the board to qualify as a geologist or engineering geologist; and

(b) Experience consisting of a minimum of five years of professional practice in geology or a specialty thereof as required under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character acceptable to the board;

(10) An applicant who applies for licensing in a specialty within one year after recognition of the specialty under this chapter shall be considered qualified for licensing in that specialty, without further written examination, if the applicant:

(a) Is qualified for licensing as a geologist in this state; and

(b) Has experience consisting of a minimum five years of professional practice in the applicable specialty of geology as required under subsections (3) and (7) of this section, of a character acceptable to the board; and

(11) The geologists initially appointed to the board under RCW 18.220.030 shall be qualified for licensing under subsections (7) and (8) of this section.

[ 2003 c 292 s 1; 2000 c 253 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 292: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2003]." [ 2003 c 292 s 3.]